apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="goappá/sj__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjin</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjinga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjinge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjingen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Ess"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjada</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadak</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagá</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagi</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadaga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadakga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagága</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagiga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadage</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadak</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadakge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagáge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagák</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagige</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagik</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadakgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagágen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjadagigen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjajn</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjajnga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjajnge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjajngen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjas</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjasga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjasge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjasgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjij</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjijga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjijge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjijgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjan</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjanga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjange</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjangen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sj</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjge</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sjgen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tja</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjaga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjage</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjak</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjagen</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjav</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjavga</l>
          <r>sj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjavge</l>

    <e lm="goappásj"><i>goappá</i><par n="goappá/sj__Pron_Indef"/></e>
